North Dakota, session 69, SB2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-05-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-05-10. Hearing on petition - Notice - ReportDetermination on feasibility - Copy of
reportdetermination filed - Submitted to electors.
The department of water resources shall examine the petition, maps, papers, probable cost, and
data pertaining to the proposed irrigation district and shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition. A
notice stating the petition will be heard, and stating the time and place of hearing, must be filed with the
county auditor of each county in which the proposed district is located. The notice must be published
once each week for two consecutive weeks in the newspapers of general circulation where the district
is located and in the official newspaper of each county in which the district is located. The date set for
the hearing on the petition may not be less than twenty days after the first publication of the notice.
Before the hearing the department shall review the maps, preliminary designs, probable cost, and
feasibility study and shall prepare, or shall cause to be prepared a summary report showing the
probable cost of the proposed irrigation works anddetermination outlining the practicability and
feasibility of the plan of irrigation suggested or proposed by petitioners for the irrigation of the lands
within the district. A copy of the reportdetermination must be filed with the county auditor of each county
in which the proposed irrigation district is situated, and the reportdetermination must be open to public
inspection. The department of water resources also shall submit the reportdetermination to the electors
of the proposed district at the meeting set for hearing the petition for the organization of the proposed
district.

S. B. NO. 2065 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2065.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State